Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.055

Governor-elect—Appropriation to provide office and staff.

The legislature preceding the gubernatorial election shall make an appropriation which may only be expended by a newly elected governor other than the incumbent for the purpose of providing office and staff for the governor-elect preparatory to his or her assumption of duties as governor. The funds for the appropriation shall be made available to him or her not later than thirty days prior to the date when the legislature will convene.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5016; 1969 ex.s. c 88 s 1.]